Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 8. Interstate Rendition

407.5801.
Grounds for rendition.

For purposes of this section and KRS

407.5802

, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

.

The governor of this state may:

Demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

On the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee.

A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled from the demanding state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 59; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 68, effective June 24, 2015.

407.5802.
Conditions of rendition.

Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the governor of this state may require a prosecutor of this state to demonstrate that at least sixty (60) days previously the obligee had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

or that the proceedings would be of no avail.

If, under KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

, or a law substantially similar to KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

, the governor of another state makes a demand that the governor of this state surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual to whom a duty of support is owed, the governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 60; 1998, ch. 101, § 20, effective March 23, 1998; 2015 ch. 18, § 69, effective June 24, 2015.